test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_naver_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - naver: # MLO, ok; ess. often also naharin; par naharid; not according to the paradigm but could be accepted.
    naver+N+Sg+Nom: naṿer
    naver+N+Sg+Gen: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Acc: nahhaar
    naver+N+Sg+Ill: naharân
    naver+N+Sg+Loc: naharist
    naver+N+Sg+Com: naharáin
    naver+N+Sg+Abe: nahhaarttáá
    naver+N+Ess: naṿerin
    naver+N+Par: naṿerid
    naver+N+Pl+Nom: nahareh
    naver+N+Pl+Gen: naharij
    naver+N+Pl+Acc: naharijd
    naver+N+Pl+Ill: naharáid
    naver+N+Pl+Loc: naharijn
    naver+N+Pl+Com: naharijguin
    naver+N+Pl+Abe: naharijttáá

  Noun - käävir: # MLO, ok; ess. often also kähirin; par kähirid; see above
    käävir+N+Sg+Nom: kääṿir
    käävir+N+Sg+Gen: käähir
    käävir+N+Sg+Acc: käähir
    käävir+N+Sg+Ill: kähirân
    käävir+N+Sg+Loc: kähirist
    käävir+N+Sg+Com: kähiráin
    käävir+N+Sg+Abe: käähirttáá
    käävir+N+Ess: käṿirin
    käävir+N+Par: käṿirid
    käävir+N+Pl+Nom: kähireh
    käävir+N+Pl+Gen: kähirij
    käävir+N+Pl+Acc: kähirijd
    käävir+N+Pl+Ill: kähiráid
    käävir+N+Pl+Loc: kähirijn
    käävir+N+Pl+Com: kähirijguin
    käävir+N+Pl+Abe: kähirijttáá
